Arkansas, session 2025, HB1487.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-31-102(g), concerning membership of the
Arkansas Forestry Commission, is amended to read as follows:
(g)(1) The commission shall create a committee to make recommendations
to the commission, including without limitation recommendations regarding:
(A) Rulemaking;
(B) Disciplinary issues;
(C) Ethical complaints; and
(D) Evaluation of applications under § 17-31-101 et seq.
(2) The Three (3) of the registered forester members of the
commission designated under subdivision (f)(2) of this section and the
University of Arkansas at Monticello representative to the commission shall
be designated as members of the committee by the Chair of the Arkansas
Forestry Commission.
(3) The chair shall appoint no less than three (3) registered
foresters who are not members of the commission to serve on the committee.
*CRH131*
02/13/2025 2:10:45 PM CRH131

HB1487
(4) The Chair of the Arkansas Forestry Commission chair may also
designate other Arkansas-registered foresters, including those who are
members of the commission but are not on the committee, to serve on the
committee on an ad hoc basis.
































02/13/2025 2:10:45 PM CRH131